Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,110.11
Examining board; members; expenses.

Each member of the examining board shall receive, when authorized, all necessary travel, meals, and lodging expenses incidental to the performance of his or her official duties or while attending national meetings or seminars as the official representative of the examining board as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177 for state employees.

Laws 1971, LB 442, § 13;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 180.